Virginia statutes. Title 29. Game, Inland Fisheries and Dogs.
§§ 29-1 through 29-248.

Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

For comprehensive animal laws, see § 3.2-6500 et seq.

As to game, inland fisheries and boating, see §

29.1-100

et seq.

As to control of rabies, see §

32.1-48.1

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Repealed § 29-32.1 was amended by Acts 1987, c. 505.